test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kotus15_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kotus: # Noun (15) kotus 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom: kotus
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen: [kotusõ, kotussõ]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Par: kotust
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill: [kotussõhe, kotussõdõ]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ine: [kotussõn, kotussõh, kotussõhn]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ela: kotussõst
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+All: kotussõlõ
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ade: kotussõl
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abl: kotussõlt
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Tra: kotussõs
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ter: kotussõniq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abe: kotussõldaq
     kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Com: [kotusõgaq, kotussõgaq]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom: [kotusõq, kotussõq]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen: [kotussidõ, kotussiidõ, kotustõ]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Par: [kotussit, kotussiid]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill: [kotussihe, kotussiihe, kotussidõ, kotussiidõ, kotustõhe]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ine: [kotussin, kotussiin, kotussih, kotussiih, kotussihn, kotussiihn, kotustõn, kotustõh, kotustõhn]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ela: [kotussist, kotussiist, kotustõst]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+All: [kotussilõ, kotussiilõ, kotustõlõ]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ade: [kotussil, kotussiil, kotustõl]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abl: [kotussilt, kotussiilt, kotustõlt]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Tra: [kotussis, kotussiis, kotustõs]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ter: [kotussiniq, kotussiiniq, kotustõniq]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abe: [kotussildaq, kotussiildaq, kotustõldaq]
     kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Com: [kotussidõgaq, kotussiidõgaq, kotustõgaq]
